North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 1. General Provisions for State Administration.
§ 115D-5.
Administration of institutions by State Board of Community Colleges; personnel exempt from North Carolina Human Resources Act; extension courses; tuition waiver; in-plant training; contracting, etc., for establishment and operation of extension units of the community college system; use of existing public school facilities. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The State Board of Community Colleges may adopt and execute such policies, regulations and standards concerning the establishment, administration, and operation of institutions as the State Board may deem necessary to insure the quality of educational programs, to promote the systematic meeting of educational needs of the State, and to provide for the equitable distribution of State and federal funds to the several institutions.The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish standards and scales for salaries and allotments paid from funds administered by the State Board, and all employees of the institutions shall be exempt from the provisions of the North Carolina Human Resources Act. Any and all salary caps set by the State Board for community college presidents shall apply only to the State-paid portion of the salary. Except as otherwise provided by law, the employer contribution rate on the local-paid portion of the salary, to be paid from local funds, shall be set by the State Treasurer based on actuarial recommendations. The State Board shall have authority with respect to individual institutions: to approve sites, capital improvement projects, budgets; to approve the selection of the chief administrative officer; to establish and administer standards for professional personnel, curricula, admissions, and graduation; to regulate the awarding of degrees, diplomas, and certificates; to establish and regulate student tuition and fees within policies for tuition and fees established by the General Assembly; and to establish and regulate financial accounting procedures.The State Board of Community Colleges shall require all community colleges to meet the faculty credential requirements of the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools for all community college programs.

(a1)

Notwithstanding G.S. 66-58(c)(3) or any other provisions of law, the State Board of Community Colleges may adopt rules governing the expenditure of funds derived from bookstore sales by community colleges. These expenditures shall be consistent with the mission and purpose of the Community College System. Profits may be used in the support and enhancement of the bookstores, for student aid or scholarships, for expenditures of direct benefit to students, and for other similar expenditures authorized by the board of trustees, subject to rules adopted by the State Board. These funds shall not be used to supplement salaries of any personnel.

(a2)

The State Board of Community Colleges shall comply with the provisions of G.S. 116-11(10a) to plan and implement an exchange of information between the public schools and the institutions of higher education in the State.

(a3)

The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt the following rules to assist community colleges in their administration of procedures necessary to implement

G.S. 20-11

and

G.S. 20-13.2

:

To establish the procedures a person who is or was enrolled in a community college must follow and the requirements that person must meet to obtain a driving eligibility certificate.

To require the person who is required under

G.S. 20-11

(n) to sign the driving eligibility certificate to provide the certificate if he or she determines that one of the following requirements is met:

The person seeking the certificate is eligible for the certificate under G.S. 20-11(n)(1) and is not subject to G.S. 20-11(n1).

The person seeking the certificate is eligible for the certificate under G.S. 20-11(n)(1) and G.S. 20-11(n1).

To provide for an appeal through the grievance procedures established by the board of trustees of each community college by a person who is denied a driving eligibility certificate.

To define exemplary student behavior and to define what constitutes the successful completion of a drug or alcohol treatment counseling program.The State Board also shall develop policies as to when it is appropriate to notify the Division of Motor Vehicles that a person who is or was enrolled in a community college no longer meets the requirements for a driving eligibility certificate. The State Board also shall adopt guidelines to assist the presidents of community colleges in their designation of representatives to sign driving eligibility certificates.The State Board shall develop a form for the appropriate individuals to provide their written, irrevocable consent for a community college to disclose to the Division of Motor Vehicles that the student no longer meets the conditions for a driving eligibility certificate under G.S. 20-11(n)(1) or G.S. 20-11(n1), if applicable, in the event that this disclosure is necessary to comply with G.S. 20-11 or

G.S. 20-13.2

. Other than identifying under which statutory subsection the student is no longer eligible, no other details or information concerning the student’s school record shall be released pursuant to this consent.

In order to make instruction as accessible as possible to all citizens, the teaching of curricular courses and of noncurricular extension courses at convenient locations away from institution campuses as well as on campuses is authorized and shall be encouraged. A pro rata portion of the established regular tuition rate charged a full-time student shall be charged a part-time student taking any curriculum course. In lieu of any tuition charge, the State Board of Community Colleges shall establish a uniform registration fee, or a schedule of uniform registration fees, to be charged students enrolling in extension courses for which instruction is financed primarily from State funds. The State Board of Community Colleges may provide by general and uniform regulations for waiver of tuition and registration fees for the following:

Persons not enrolled in elementary or secondary schools taking courses leading to a high school diploma or equivalent certificate.

Courses requested by the following entities that support the organizations’ training needs and are on a specialized course list approved by the State Board of Community Colleges:

Volunteer fire departments.

Municipal, county, or State fire departments.

Volunteer EMS or rescue and lifesaving departments.

Municipal, county, or State EMS or rescue and lifesaving departments.

d1.

Law enforcement, fire, EMS or rescue and lifesaving entities serving a lake authority that was created by a county board of commissioners prior to July 1, 2012.

Radio Emergency Associated Communications Teams (REACT) under contract to a county as an emergency response agency.

Municipal, county, or State law enforcement agencies.

f1.

Campus police agencies of private institutions of higher education certified by the Attorney General pursuant to Chapter 74G of the General Statutes.

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the training of full-time custodial employees and employees of the Divisions required to be certified under Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes and the rules of the Criminal Justice and Training Standards Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhh), effective December 1, 2017.

The Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians law enforcement, fire, EMS or rescue and lifesaving tribal government departments or programs.

The Criminal Justice Standards Division of the Department of Justice for the training of criminal justice professionals, as defined in G.S. 17C-20(6), who are required to be certified under (i) Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes and the rules of the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission or (ii) Chapter 17E of the General Statutes and the rules of the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission. The waivers provided for in this sub-subdivision apply to participants and recent graduates of the North Carolina Criminal Justice Fellows Program to obtain certifications for eligible criminal justice professions as defined in G.S. 17C-20(6).

(2a)

Firefighters, EMS personnel, and rescue and lifesaving personnel whose duty station is located on a military installation within North Carolina for courses that support their organizations’ training needs and are approved for this purpose by the State Board of Community Colleges.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 8.12(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Trainees enrolled in courses conducted under the Customized Training Program.

through (9) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 8.12(a), effective July 1, 2011.

(10)

Elementary and secondary school employees enrolled in courses in first aid or cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR).

(11)

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 10.6, effective July 1, 2013.

(12)

All courses taken by high school students at community colleges, in accordance with

G.S. 115D-20(4)

and this section.

(13)

Human resources development courses for any individual who (i) is unemployed; (ii) has received notification of a pending layoff; (iii) is working and is eligible for the Federal Earned Income Tax Credit (FEITC); or (iv) is working and earning wages at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty guidelines.

(14)

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 8.12(a), effective July 1, 2011.

(15)

Courses providing employability skills, job-specific occupational or technical skills, or developmental education instruction to certain students who are concurrently enrolled in an eligible community college literacy course, in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges.

(16)

Courses provided to students who are participating in a pre-apprenticeship or apprenticeship program that meets all of the following criteria:

Meets one of the following:

Is a registered apprenticeship program recognized by the United States Department of Labor.

Is a pre-apprenticeship program recognized and approved by the State agency administering the statewide apprenticeship program.

Has a documented plan of study with courses relating to a job-specific occupational or technical skill.

Requires the participants in the program to be North Carolina high school students when entering the program.The State Board of Community Colleges shall not waive tuition and registration fees for other individuals.

(b1)

The State Board of Community Colleges shall not waive tuition and registration fees for community college faculty or staff members. Community colleges may, however, use State or local funds to pay tuition and registration fees for one course per semester for full-time community college faculty or staff members employed for a nine-, ten-, eleven-, or twelve-month term. Community colleges may also use State and local funds to pay tuition and registration fees for professional development courses and for other courses consistent with the academic assistance program authorized by the State Human Resources Commission.

(b2)

Beginning February 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the Community Colleges System Office shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the number and type of waivers granted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

No course of instruction shall be offered by any community college at State expense or partial State expense to any captive or co-opted group of students, as defined by the State Board of Community Colleges, without prior approval of the State Board of Community Colleges. All course offerings approved for State prison inmates or prisoners in local jails must be tied to clearly identified job skills, transition needs, or both. Approval by the State Board of Community Colleges shall be presumed to constitute approval of both the course and the group served by that institution. The State Board of Community Colleges may delegate to the President the power to make an initial approval, with final approval to be made by the State Board of Community Colleges. A course taught without such approval will not yield any full-time equivalent students, as defined by the State Board of Community Colleges.

(c1)

Community colleges shall report full-time equivalent (FTE) student hours for correction education programs on the basis of student membership hours. No community college shall operate a multi-entry/multi-exit class or program in a prison facility, except for a literacy class or program.The State Board shall work with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety on offering classes and programs that match the average length of stay of an inmate in a prison facility.

(c2)

Courses in federal prisons shall not earn regular budget full-time equivalents, but may be offered on a self-supporting basis.

(c3)

Funds appropriated for community college courses for prison inmates shall be used only for inmates in State prisons. The first priority for the use of these funds shall be to restore the FTE for basic skills courses to the FY 2008-2009 level. Funds not needed for this purpose may be used for continuing education and curriculum courses related to job skills training.

Recodified as G.S. 115D-5.1(a) by Session Laws 2005-276, s. 8.4(a), effective July 1, 2005.

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-84, s. 3, effective May 21, 1999.

A community college may not offer a new program without the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges except that approval shall not be required if the tuition for the program will fully cover the cost of the program. If at any time tuition fails to fully cover the cost of a program that falls under the exception, the program shall be discontinued unless approved by the State Board of Community Colleges. If a proposed new program would serve more than one community college, the State Board of Community Colleges shall perform a feasibility study prior to acting on the proposal. The State Board of Community Colleges shall consider whether a regional approach can be used when developing new programs and, to the extent possible, shall initiate new programs on a regional basis.The State Board of Community Colleges shall collect data on an annual basis on all new programs and program terminations it approved and any regionalization of programs during the year, including the specific reasons for which each program was terminated or approved.

Funds appropriated to the Community Colleges System Office as operating expenses for allocation to the institutions comprising the North Carolina Community College System shall not be used to support recreation extension courses. The financing of these courses by any institution shall be on a self-supporting basis, and membership hours produced from these activities shall not be counted when computing full-time equivalent students (FTE) for use in budget-funding formulas at the State level.

Whenever a community college offers real estate continuing education courses pursuant to

G.S. 93A-4.1

, the courses shall be offered on a self-supporting basis.

Recodified as G.S. 115D-5.1(c) by Session Laws 2005-276, s. 8.4(a), effective July 1, 2005.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall use its Board Reserve Fund for feasibility studies, pilot projects, start-up of new programs, and innovative ideas.

Recodified as G.S. 115D-5.1(b) by Session Laws 2005-276, s. 8.4(a), effective July 1, 2005.

The State Board shall review and approve lease purchase and installment purchase contracts as provided under G.S. 115D-58.15(b). The State Board shall adopt policies and procedures governing the review and approval process.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall maintain an accountability function that conducts periodic reviews of each community college operating under the provisions of this Chapter. The purpose of the compliance review shall be to ensure that (i) data used to allocate State funds among community colleges is reported accurately to the System Office and (ii) community colleges are charging and waiving tuition and registration fees consistent with law. The State Board of Community Colleges shall require the use of a statistically valid sample size in performing compliance reviews of community colleges. All compliance review findings that are determined to be material shall be forwarded to the college president, local college board of trustees, the State Board of Community Colleges, and the State Auditor. The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt rules governing the frequency, scope, and standard of materiality for compliance reviews.

The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall provide the Department of Revenue with a list of all community colleges, including name, address, and other identifying information requested by the Department of Revenue. The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall update this list whenever there is a change.

All multicampus centers approved by the State Board of Community Colleges shall receive funding under the same formula. The State Board of Community Colleges shall not approve any additional multicampus centers without identified recurring sources of funding.

The North Carolina Community College System may offer courses, in accordance with Article 17D of Subchapter V of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, to individuals who choose to enter the teaching profession through residency licensure.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 8.9, effective July 1, 2009.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop curriculum and continuing education standards for courses of instruction in American Sign Language and shall encourage community colleges to offer courses in American Sign Language as a modern foreign language.

The State Board of Community Colleges may establish, retain and budget fees charged to students taking an adult high school equivalency diploma test, including fees for retesting. Fees collected for this purpose shall be used only to (i) offset the costs of the test, including the cost of scoring the test, (ii) offset the costs of printing adult high school equivalency diplomas, and (iii) meet federal and State reporting requirements related to the test.

The purpose of the first semester of the Gateway to College Program is to address additional support to successfully complete the program. Students may need to take developmental courses necessary for the transition to more challenging courses; therefore, the State Board of Community Colleges shall (i) permit high school students who are enrolled in Gateway to College Programs to enroll in developmental courses based on an assessment of their individual student needs by a high school and community college staff team and (ii) include this coursework in computing the budget FTE for the colleges.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall direct each community college to adopt a policy that authorizes a minimum of two excused absences each academic year for religious observances required by the faith of a student. The policy may require that the student provide written notice of the request for an excused absence a reasonable time prior to the religious observance. The policy shall also provide that the student shall be given the opportunity to make up any tests or other work missed due to an excused absence for a religious observance.

Community colleges may teach curriculum courses at any time during the year, including the summer term. Student membership hours from these courses shall be counted when computing full-time equivalent students (FTE) for use in budget funding formulas at the State level.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall review, at least every five years, service areas that include counties assigned to more than one community college to determine the feasibility of continuing to assign those counties to more than one community college. The State Board shall revise service areas as needed to ensure that counties are served effectively. The first review and any revisions shall be completed no later than March 1, 2016, and the State Board shall report its findings and any revisions to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than March 1, 2016. All subsequent reviews and revisions shall also be submitted to the Committee.

In addition to the evaluation of cooperative innovative high schools by the State Board of Education pursuant to

G.S. 115C-238.55

, the State Board of Community Colleges, in conjunction with the State Board of Education and the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, shall evaluate the success of students participating in the Career and College Promise Program, including the College Transfer pathway and the Career and Technical Education pathway. Success shall be measured by high school retention rates, high school completion rates, high school dropout rates, certification and associate degree completion, admission to four-year institutions, postgraduation employment in career or study-related fields, and employer satisfaction of employees who participated in the programs. The evaluation shall also include an analysis of the cost of students participating in each of the programs within the Career and College Promise Program, including at least the following:

Total enrollment funding, the number of budgeted full-time equivalent students, and the number of students enrolled in courses through cooperative innovative high schools, the College Transfer pathway, and the Career and Technical Education pathway.

The cost and number of waivers of tuition and registration fees provided for students enrolled in courses through cooperative innovative high schools, the College Transfer pathway, and the Career and Technical Education pathway.

Any additional costs of a student attending courses on campus if a student is not attending public school in a local school administrative unit for the majority of the student’s instructional time.The Boards shall jointly report by March 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly. The report shall be combined with the evaluation of cooperative innovative high schools required by

G.S. 115C-238.55

, and the Community Colleges System Office shall be responsible for submitting the combined report.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy to be applied uniformly throughout the Community College System to provide that any student enrolled in a community college who is a National Guard service member placed onto State active duty status during an academic term shall be given an excused absence for the period of time the student is on active duty. The policy shall further provide all of the following:

The student shall be given the opportunity to make up any test or other work missed during the excused absence.

The student shall be given the option, when feasible, to continue classes and coursework during the academic term through online participation for the period of time the student is placed on active duty.

The student shall be given the option of receiving a temporary grade of “incomplete (IN)” or “absent from the final exam (AB)” for any course that the student was unable to complete as a result of being placed on State active duty status; however, the student must complete the course requirements within the period of time specified by the community college to avoid receiving a failing grade for the course.

The student shall be permitted to drop, with no penalty, any course that the student was unable to complete as a result of being placed on State active duty status.

History.

1963, c. 488, s. 23; 1967, c. 652; 1969, c. 1294; 1973, c. 768; 1975, c. 882; 1977, c. 1065; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, ss. 5-7; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1981, c. 609; c. 859, s. 35.1; c. 897; c. 1127, s. 43; 1983, c. 717, s. 28; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 45, 46; 1985, c. 479, s. 67; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, s. 22; 1987, c. 282, s. 34; c. 564, ss. 8-10, 12, 33; c. 763, s. 1; 1989, c. 162; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 915, s. 1; c. 1066, s. 91; 1991, c. 689, ss. 44, 48; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 880, s. 4; 1993, c. 170, s. 2; c. 321, ss. 111, 117(e); c. 492, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 18.4; 1995, c. 288, s. 2; c. 324, s. 16.4; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, ss. 17.4, 17.7(a); 1997-443, ss. 9.5, 9.6(a), 11A.118(a); 1997-507, s. 4; 1998-111, s. 3; 1998-202, s. 4(q); 1999-84, ss. 3, 9; 1999-243, s. 9; 2000-137, s. 4(t); 2001-111, s. 1; 2001-427, s. 9(b); 2001-487, s. 47(e); 2004-124, s. 8.4; 2005-193, s. 1; 2005-198, s. 3; 2005-247, s. 3; 2005-276, ss. 8.4(a), 8.6; 2005-395, s. 25; 2006-203, s. 37; 2007-154, s. 2(a); 2007-484, ss. 29(a), 35; 2008-107, ss. 8.11, 8.17, 8.18; 2009-208, s. 1; 2009-451, ss. 8.8, 8.9, 8.11(d), (e); 2009-570, s. 42; 2009-575, s. 5; 2010-31, ss. 8.3(b), (d), 8.4(a), 8.11; 2010-112, s. 2; 2010-113, s. 1; 2011-145, ss. 8.2(b), 8.12(a), (b), 8.13, 19.1(h), (k), (l), 31.2; 2011-391, s. 18(a), (b); 2012-83, s. 41; 2012-142, ss. 8.3(a), 8.8; 2013-360, ss. 10.4(b), 10.6, 10.12, 10.15(a); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2014-115, s. 28(e); 2015-167, s. 2.5; 2015-241, ss. 8.41(k), 10.2(a), 10.5(a), 10.6(a), (b); 2016-94, ss. 10.3(a), 10.4(a); 2017-57, ss. 7.22(g), 9.8(a), 9.10(a), (c); 2017-155, s. 2(a); 2017-186, ss. 2(hhhhh), 3(a); 2017-189, s. 6(g); 2017-212, s. 2.1; 2018-5, s. 17.1(c); 2018-97, s. 5.1; 2019-165, ss. 1.5(a), 3.3(b), 3.4; 2019-235, ss. 3.2(a), 3.4(a), (b); 2020-54, s. 1; 2021-180, ss. 6.3(a), 19C.9(lll).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 115D-5

.

Cross References.

As to the use of community college personnel or facilities by private businesses, see G.S. 115D-20(12).

Start-up Finds for High-Cost Workforce Courses.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 9.5, as amended by Session Laws
2019-165, s. 1.4, provides: “(a) The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish the Community College High-Cost Workforce Program Grant to allocate funds to community colleges to establish new high-cost workforce Tier 1A and Tier 1B courses that require significant start-up funds. The State Board shall adopt an application process for community colleges to apply for the award of funds to establish new courses beginning with the 2018-2019 fiscal year. To be eligible to receive the funds, community colleges shall submit to the State Board a completed application, which shall include at least the following information:

“(1) A description of the proposed program of study.

“(2) An impact assessment of implementing the proposed course on existing programs at contiguous colleges.

“(3) Documentation of student interest in the course.

“(4) Alignment of the course with the future employment needs within the area served by the community college and the State.

“(b) Repealed by
Session Laws
2019-165, s. 1.4, effective July 26, 2019.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 9.14 provides: “(a) Of the funds appropriated by this act to the Community Colleges System Office for the 2017-2018 fiscal year, the System Office shall allocate funds to community colleges to support short-term workforce training courses leading to industry credentials. The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt an application process for community colleges to apply to receive these funds. These funds shall be allocated at the same full-time equivalent (FTE) value as curriculum courses.

(b) By April 1, 2018, the State Board of Community Colleges shall submit a report on the implementation of this section to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management.

Session Laws
1993, c. 321, s. 119, effective July 1, 1993, provides that the State Board of Community Colleges shall undertake a comprehensive review of the mission of the North Carolina Community College System in order to ensure that it is well-prepared to meet changing educational and economic needs as the State moves into the Twenty-first Century, that the Monitoring Committee of the Commission on the Future of the North Carolina Community College System shall serve as an independent body to monitor and review the issues, that the State Board of Community Colleges shall make interim reports to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than April 15, 1994, and no later than January 15, 1995, and that thereafter, the State Board shall make annual reports to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by January 15 of each year until the Monitoring Committee terminates, at which time the State Board shall make a final report.

Session Laws
1993, c. 321, s. 321, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 1993-95 biennium, the textual provisions of this act shall apply only to funds appropriated for and activities occurring during the 1993-95 biennium.”

Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 18, provides that the State Board of Community Colleges shall require that all new programs it approves be developed using a regional approach, unless there are extenuating circumstances, and expresses the legislative intent to increase the number of regional program offerings in community colleges and to eliminate as much duplication as possible. Quarterly reports are to be made to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee.

Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 43.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 1994-95 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 1994-95 fiscal year.”

The designation of subsection (h) of this section was assigned by the Revisor of Statutes, the designation in Session Laws
1993, c. 492, s. 2 having been (g).

Session Laws
1995, c. 324, s. 28.3, and Session Laws
1995, c. 507, s. 28.9, provide: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 1995-97 biennium, the textual provisions of this act shall apply only to funds appropriated for and activities occurring during the 1995-97 biennium.”

Session Laws
1997-443, s. 9.6(a) added a subsection (j) which has been designated herein as subsection (k) at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws
1997-507, s. 8, effective September 17, 1997, provides that the act constitutes a recent act of the General Assembly within the meaning of

G.S. 150B-21.1

, and that agencies are authorized to adopt temporary rules to implement the act.

Session Laws
1999-237, s. 9.15, provides that

G.S. 115D-5

or any other provision of law notwithstanding, the State Board of Community Colleges shall not charge tuition or fees to volunteer firefighters and volunteer EMS workers for courses required for certification.

Session Laws
1999-237, s. 30.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 1999-2001 biennium.”

Session Laws
1999-237, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 1999’.”

Session Laws
1999-237, s. 30.4, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2001-146, s. 1, provides: “The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, the State Board of Community Colleges, and the Department of Public Instruction shall work cooperatively to expand the opportunities for military personnel to enroll in and complete teacher education programs prior to discharge from the military.
The cooperative effort shall include the expansion, as feasible, of teacher education classes and programs on military bases and at alternate nearby sites, through Internet-based course offerings, and through cooperative education programs.
The cooperative effort shall also focus on the educational needs unique to active military personnel who are potential teachers or teacher assistants and ways to make the necessary classes and programs more accessible to them.
A special effort shall also be made to communicate with and inform military personnel of the educational opportunities available on military bases, at alternate sites near military bases, through long-distance education, and through cooperative education.”

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 30.6, provides: “The General Assembly finds that standardization of the term of contracts with community college faculty members will provide the General Assembly with the data necessary to make informed decisions regarding faculty salaries and
funding for the summer term.
Therefore, the State Board of Community Colleges shall require community colleges to convert all faculty contracts to nine-month contracts covering the fall and spring semesters. Faculty members currently employed for more than nine months shall be placed on supplemental contracts for the summer term. These modifications in faculty contracts shall not change the salary of any faculty member.

“All faculty members employed after the date this act [Session Laws 2001-424] becomes law [July 1, 2001] shall be placed on nine-month contracts with supplemental contracts for the summer term.”

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 30.10 (a) and (b), provides: “(a)The Bureau of Training Initiatives funded by the Worker Training Trust Fund is transferred from the North Carolina Department of Labor to the North Carolina Community Colleges System, as if by a Type I transfer as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

, with all the elements of such a transfer.
The Bureau of Training Initiatives is designed to provide training services and develop new training innovations similar to the North Carolina Community Colleges System’s Workforce Development programs. Consolidating these efforts at the North Carolina Community Colleges System will result in greater efficiencies and coordination.

“No changes in the organizational structure of the programs transferred under this subsection [s. 30.10(a) of Session Laws 2001-424], other than those provided by this subsection [s. 30.10(a) of Session Laws 2001-424], shall take place prior to January 1, 2002. The State Board of Community Colleges shall present a plan for such changes to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no less than 30 days before they are proposed to become effective.

“(b) The Apprenticeship program currently housed within the North Carolina Department of Labor is transferred to the North Carolina Community Colleges System, as if by a Type I transfer as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

, with all the elements of such a transfer. Joint delivery of Apprenticeship and Community College workforce training programs will ensure coordination of program delivery and appropriate classroom training supporting the needs of the client and the employer. The community colleges already provide the majority of classroom training for Apprenticeship.

“If the transfer made by this subsection [s. 30.10(b) of Session Laws 2001-424] is subject to approval by the United States Department of Labor, the effective date of this subsection [s. 30.10(b) of Session Laws 2001-424] is the date of such approval.

“No changes in the organizational structure of the programs transferred under this subsection [s. 30.10 (b) of Session Laws 2001-424], other than those provided by this subsection [s. 30.10(b) of Session Laws 2001-424], shall take place prior to January 1, 2002. The State Board of Community Colleges shall present a plan for such changes to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no less than 30 days before they are proposed to become effective.”

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2001’.”

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 36.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 36.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2002-126, s. 8.2, as amended by Session Laws
2019-165, s. 1.5(b), provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to increase the number of regional program offerings in community colleges and to reduce duplication of programs by colleges that are within reasonably close proximity to each other; therefore, the State Board of Community Colleges shall review existing programs to determine which of the existing programs can be offered regionally.”

Session Laws
2003-300, s. 5(a) and (b), provides: “(a) Community College Refunds. — Upon request of the student, each community college shall:

“(1) Grant a full refund of curriculum tuition and fees to military reserve and national guard personnel called to active duty or active personnel who have received temporary or permanent reassignments as a result of military operations that make it impossible for them to complete their course requirements; and

“(2) Buy back textbooks through the colleges’ bookstore operations to the extent possible. Colleges shall use distance-learning technologies and other educational methodologies to help these students, under the guidance of faculty and administrative staff, complete their course requirements.

“(b) Upon request of the student, each community college shall:

“(1) Grant a full refund of extension registration fees to military reserve and national guard personnel called to active duty or active personnel who have received temporary or permanent reassignments as a result of military operations that make it impossible for them to complete their course requirements; and

“(2) Buy back textbooks through the colleges’ bookstore operations to the extent possible. Colleges shall use distance-learning technologies and other educational methodologies to help these students, under the guidance of faculty and administrative staff, complete their course requirements.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 8.3(a)-(h), provides for the establishment of a community college faculty salary plan that (1) provides accountability to the General Assembly, (2) maintains local flexibility and autonomy for the community colleges, and (3) ensures that community college faculty members have a uniform minimum salary based on level of education, equivalent applicable experience, or both. Session Laws,
2004-124, s. 8.3(g), provides that the State Board of Community Colleges shall report on the implementation of this plan by December 1, 2004, and every year thereafter through December 1, 2009.

The first paragraph of Session Laws
2004-124, s. 8.9, effective July 1, 2004, was codified as subsection (o) of this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2004’.”

Session Laws